Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.060

Statistical information and reports—National fire incident reporting system.

(1) The chief of each organized fire department, or the sheriff or other designated county official having jurisdiction over areas not within the jurisdiction of any fire department, shall report statistical information and data to the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, on each fire occurring within the official's jurisdiction and, within two business days, report any death resulting from fire.

(2) Reports submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be consistent with the national fire incident reporting system developed by the United States fire administration and rules established by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection. Rules established by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, must require fire departments to report data on the age of any structure involved in a fire when that information is available through property records or other methods.

(3) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall administer the national fire incident reporting system including, but not limited to, the following responsibilities:

(a) Purchasing equipment, including software, needed for the operation of the reporting system;

(b) Establishing procedures, standards, and guidelines pertaining to the statistical information and data reported by fire departments through the reporting system;

(c) Providing training and education to fire departments pertaining to the reporting system; and

(d) Employing staff to administer the reporting system, as needed.

(4) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, and the department of natural resources shall jointly determine the statistical information to be reported on fires on land under the jurisdiction of the department of natural resources.

(5) The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall analyze the information and data reported, compile a report, and distribute a copy annually by July 1st to each chief fire official in the state. Upon request, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall also furnish a copy of the report to any other interested person at cost.

(6) For purposes of this section, "national fire incident reporting system" or "reporting system" means the national fire incident reporting system or the state equivalent as selected by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection.

[ 2017 c 308 s 1; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 50; 1999 c 231 s 1; 1995 c 369 s 29; 1986 c 266 s 72; 1985 c 470 s 22; 1980 c 181 s 2. Formerly RCW 48.48.065.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 470: See notes following RCW 43.44.010.